Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.820

Solicitation for hosting national legislative association conference.

When soliciting gifts, grants, or donations to host an official conference within the state of Washington of a national legislative association as approved by both the chief clerk and the secretary of the senate, designated legislative officials and designated legislative employees are presumed not to be in violation of the solicitation and receipt of gift provisions in this chapter. For the purposes of this section, any legislative association must include among its membership the Washington state legislature or individual legislators or legislative staff.

[ 2003 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1.]